Nebraska, session 109, LB528.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB528 LB528
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-1054, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1054 (1)(a) This subsection applies until July 1, 2024.
(b) The State Board of Education shall establish a competitive
innovation grant program with funding from the Nebraska Education
Improvement Fund pursuant to section 79-3501. Grantees shall be a school
district, an educational service unit, or a combination of entities that
includes at least one school district or educational service unit. For
grantees that consist of a combination of entities, a participating
school district or educational service unit shall be designated to act as
the fiscal agent and administer the program funded by the grant. The
state board shall only award grants pursuant to applications that the
state board deems to be sufficiently innovative and to have a high chance
of success.
(c) An application for a grant pursuant to this subsection shall
describe:
(i) Specific measurable objectives for improving education outcomes
for early childhood students, elementary students, middle school
students, or high school students or for improving the transitions
between any successive stages of education or between education and the
workforce;
(ii) The method for annually evaluating progress toward a measurable
objective, with a summative evaluation of progress submitted to the state
board and electronically to the Education Committee of the Legislature on
or before July 1, 2019;
(iii) The potential for the project to be both scalable and
replicable; and
(iv) Any cost savings that could be achieved by reductions in other
programs if the funded program is successful.
(d) Based on evaluations received on or before July 1, 2019, for
each grant, the State Board of Education shall recommend the grant
-2-

LB528 LB528
2025 2025
project as:
(i) Representing a best practice;
(ii) A model for a state-supported program; or
(iii) A local issue for further study.
(e) On or before December 1, 2017, and on or before December 1 of
each year thereafter, the state board shall electronically submit a
report to the Clerk of the Legislature on all such grants, including, but
not limited to, the results of the evaluations for each grant. The state
board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this
subsection, including, but not limited to, application procedures,
selection procedures, and annual evaluation reporting procedures.
(1)(a) (2)(a) This subsection applies beginning July 1, 2024.
(b) The State Board of Education shall establish an improvement
grant program in areas including, but not limited to, (i) teacher
recruitment and retention, (ii) improvement for schools and school
districts, (iii) improvement in student performance in the subject areas
of reading and mathematics, and (iv) other improvement areas identified
by the state board. Such grants shall be funded using lottery funds under
section 79-3501.
(c) On or before December 1 of each calendar year, the state board
shall electronically submit a report to the Clerk of the Legislature on
all such grant programs, including, but not limited to, the recipients of
the programs and evaluations of the effectiveness of each grant program.
The state board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out this subsection.
(2)(a) (3)(a) This subsection applies beginning January 1, 2024.
(b) For purposes of this subsection: ,
(i) Department means the Department of Economic Development; and
(ii) Learning learning platform means a three-dimensional, game-
based learning platform for use by middle school and high school
students.
-3-

LB528 LB528
2025 2025
(c)(i) The department State Board of Education shall establish a
grant program to procure or purchase an annual license for a preexisting
learning platform platforms for use in schools to engage students in
coursework and careers in science, technology, and engineering , and
mathematics. Such grants shall be funded using lottery funds pursuant to
section 79-3501. Grant funds shall only be used to procure or purchase an
annual license and shall not be awarded for the purpose of research and
development of a learning platform.
(ii) The State Board of Education shall establish standards that a
learning platform shall meet in the subject areas of chemistry, physical
science, and mathematics. The department state board shall develop the
criteria to prioritize the grant applications.
(iii)(A) (iii) A developer may apply to the department Commissioner
of Education in a manner prescribed by the department state board for a
grant under this subsection for a learning platform that:
(I) (A) Is designed to teach information related to chemistry,
physical science, or mathematics;
(II) (B) Aligns with the academic content standards established by
the State Board of Education state board relating to high school
chemistry or , physical science and the equivalent of such standards used
for middle school education , or mathematics;
(III) (C) Connects such standards with real-world technologies and
applications;
(IV) (D) Highlights science, technology, and engineering , and
mathematics career pathways in Nebraska; and
(V) Complies with the ISO 27001 data security standards; and (E)
Meets any additional requirements set out by the State Board of
Education.
(VI) Demonstrates experience with statewide implementation of a
learning platform.
(B) A grant application approved by the Department of Economic
-4-

LB528 LB528
2025 2025
Development shall be awarded from the State Department of Education
Improvement Grant Fund administered by the State Department of Education.
(iv) Any developer that receives a grant under this subsection shall
provide access to and use of its learning platform to all Nebraska school
districts.
(v) Any grant awarded pursuant to this subsection shall be awarded
by July 1 of each year.
(d) On or before December 1 of each calendar year, the Department of
Economic Development state board shall electronically submit a report to
the Clerk of the Legislature on the grant program, including, but not
limited to, the recipients of the program and evaluations of the
effectiveness of the grant program. The department State Board of
Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out
this subsection.
(3)(a) (4)(a) The State Department of Education Improvement Grant
Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the State Department
of Education and shall consist of transfers pursuant to section 79-3501,
repayments of grant funds, and interest payments received in the course
of administering this section. The fund shall be used to carry out this
section. Transfers may be made from the fund to the Education Future Fund
at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the State Department of
Education Improvement Grant Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(b) Of the ten percent of funds transferred to the fund pursuant to
section 79-3501, eight and three-fourths percent shall be used for
improvement grants pursuant to subsection (2) (3) of this section and the
remaining one and one-fourth percent shall be used for grants pursuant to
subsection (1) (2) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-1054, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-5-